North Carolina statutes. Chapter 129. Public Buildings and Grounds.
Article 1. General Services Division. [Repealed]

§§ 129-1 through 129-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1097, s. 5.

§ 129-4.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 143-340

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1097, s. 2.

§ 129-5.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 143-341

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1097, s. 3.

§§ 129-6 through 129-9.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 143-345.1

to 143-345.4 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1097, s. 4.

§§ 129-10,
129-11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1097, s. 5.